Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
General Provisions

§ 21-25-1.
Fire marshal.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to appoint a fire marshal, who may be the mayor, or any member of the governing authority of the municipality, or the city or town marshal. The fire marshal shall have the power to remove and keep away from the vicinity of any fire all idle and suspicious persons lurking near the same. He shall have the power to compel any person present to aid in the extinguishment of such fire or the preservation of property exposed to the danger of such fire and to aid in preventing goods from being purloined thereat. He shall also have such powers and duties as may be prescribed by ordinance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2967; 1906, § 3352; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5849; 1930, § 2428; 1942, § 3374-140; Laws, 1938, ch. 331; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 140, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-25-3.
Establishment and maintenance of fire departments; reimbursement of training expenses.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to provide for the prevention and extinguishment of fires, to organize, establish, operate, and maintain fire and hook and ladder companies, to provide for and maintain a fire department and system, and to regulate the same. The governing authorities shall have the power to allow the fire department to attend and help to extinguish a fire outside the city limits.

No fire fighter whose training expenses have been reimbursed to or paid by the political subdivision employing the fire fighter shall leave the employ of the political subdivision for not less than two (2) years after completion of the reimbursed training, unless the reimbursed expenses are paid by the new employer to the political subdivision which reimbursed or paid such expenses. The amount to be paid shall be determined on a pro rata basis based upon when the fire fighter leaves the political subdivision within the two-year period. Defined training expenses are related to minimum standards training, as established by the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board which were incurred and include salary, tuition, travel expenses of the employee as well as personnel cost related to the training incurred during the employee’s absence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2967; 1906, § 3352; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5849; 1930, § 2428; 1942, § 3374-140; Laws, 1938, ch. 331; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 140; Laws, 1995, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-25-5.
Fire departments authorized to go outside municipal limits; liability.

The fire departments, including the apparatus and all vehicles of such departments, are hereby authorized to use the roads, highways, streets and alleys outside the corporate limits of such municipalities owning and operating such fire fighting and fire prevention equipment, for the purpose of aiding in the extinguishing and prevention of fires or in the alleviating of damages or injuries caused by tornadoes or other casualties in locations outside the corporate limits of such municipalities. For the purpose of expediting the extinguishment or prevention of fires and of aiding in the rescue of persons or preventing other damage to either persons or property in such locations outside the corporate limits of such municipalities or in cities, towns, or villages located and situated beyond the corporate limits of such municipalities owning such equipment, such fire departments are hereby extended the right of way, or priority in use, over the public roads, highways, streets and alleys of the state and counties whether such roads, highways, streets or alleys are maintained by the state, counties, cities, towns, or villages.

To further effectuate and put into force and effect the purposes of this section, such municipalities owning and operating said equipment are hereby declared free of any liability on account of injury to persons or damage to property in going to and from such locations outside the corporate limits when engaged in the extinguishing and prevention of fires or in the alleviating of damages or injuries caused by tornadoes or other casualties, it being the purpose of this section that such municipalities aiding other municipalities or residents of the State of Mississippi located outside the corporate limits of such municipalities shall be entitled to all the benefits and immunities, both from civil and criminal prosecution, as are now enjoyed by such municipalities within their own respective corporate limits. This section shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3470; Laws, 1942, ch. 227; Laws, 1958, ch. 510; Laws, 1964, ch. 502, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1964).

§ 21-25-7.
Hours of work for firemen limited; report to be made to state rating bureau.

In all municipalities of this state maintaining a paid fire department, the personnel of which department is actively and exclusively engaged in fire duty, no member of such department, exclusive of the chief officer, shall be required to remain on active duty for an entire twenty-four hours. The personnel of such fire department shall be divided into two platoons, or shifts, one to perform duty in the daytime and the other to perform duty in the nighttime, but neither platoon, or shift, shall be required to remain on active duty in any event for more than fourteen hours per day, except in cases of urgent and extreme necessity.

Each municipality coming within the provisions of this section shall immediately submit to the Mississippi state rating bureau the set-up and organization of its fire department which will be necessary in order to comply with the provisions of this section and which can be effected without employing more than one additional fireman. Such municipality shall require of said rating bureau a ruling as to whether or not such a set-up and organization of its fire department would adversely affect the present insurance rating of such municipality; if said rating bureau in answer to such request shall give a written ruling in the affirmative the municipality requesting such ruling shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3471; Laws, 1934, ch. 326.

§ 21-25-9.
Medical and hospital care for injured firemen.

In all municipalities of this state maintaining a paid or volunteer fire department, the personnel of which department is actively and exclusively engaged in fire duty, the governing authorities of such municipality may pay out of the general fund of such municipality reasonable hospital and medical expenses for any member of said fire department on account of any occupational disease contracted or for any accident sustained by said member by reason of his service or discharge of his duty in said department. The governing authorities of such city shall be the sole judge as to whether such illness or such injury was contracted or sustained in the line of duty of any such employee, and the reasonableness of said expenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 420; Laws, 1956, ch. 396.

§ 21-25-11.
Purchase of certain insurance for firemen; payment of premiums.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population in excess of 140,000 people by virtue of the 1960 census are hereby authorized to purchase insurance coverage to protect firemen working under the direction of the municipal authorities, against any suit or claims growing out of any action of such firemen guilty of false arrest, false imprisonment, false or improper service of process, malicious prosecution or any other claim resulting from such officers’ performance of official duties.

Such municipal authorities shall have the right to pay out of the general fund of such municipality any premiums which may become due on the aforesaid insurance policies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-151.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1971).